test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aqbbwnz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - aʼbbõnz: # Noun 228 'eng /est habemekarv/fin' - full paradigm
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Nom: [aʼbbõnz, abbõnz]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Gen: [aʼbbõn, abbõn]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Par: [aʼbbõnzt, abbõnzt]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Dat: [aʼbbõnõn, abbõnõn]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ins: [aʼbbõnõks, abbõnõks]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ill: [aʼbbõnõ, abbõnõ]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Sg+Ela: [aʼbbõnõst, abbõnõst]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Nom: [aʼbbõnd, abbõnd]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Gen: [aʼbbõnd, abbõnd]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Par: [aʼbbiņi, abbiņi]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Dat: [aʼbbõndõn, abbõndõn]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ins: [aʼbbõndõks, abbõndõks]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ill: [aʼbbiņiž, abbiņiž]
     aʼbbõnz+N+Pl+Ela: [aʼbbiņist, abbiņist]
